Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 9 Hospice Care

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31, effective February 3, 1984, redesignated former Article 8 as present Article 9 to correct a duplication in article designations.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hospice emergency drug kits, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Nursing Homes, Long Term Care Facilities and Hospice Emergency Drug Kits, § 480-24-.07.

31-7-170.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Hospice Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on healthcare law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 1051 (2020).

31-7-171.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that there is an interest in and need for hospice care, an alternative form of health care, for terminally ill patients and their families. The General Assembly further finds that hospice care is an important innovation which should be recognized and encouraged.

Recognizing that hospice programs respond to the need for responsible, compassionate, palliative care for terminally ill persons and for their families, extending into the bereavement period, this General Assembly establishes definitions, standards, and provisions for licensure and regulation for hospice programs in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.

31-7-172.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Advanced and progressive disease” means a serious life-threatening medical condition which is irreversible and which will continue indefinitely, where there is no reasonable hope of recovery, but where the patient’s medical prognosis is one in which there is a life expectancy of up to two years. This term does not include terminally ill patients as defined in paragraph (12) of this Code section.

“Bereavement services” means the supportive services provided to the family unit to assist it in coping with the patient’s death, including follow-up assessment and assistance through the first year after death.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Health care facility” means hospitals; other special care units, including but not limited to podiatric facilities; skilled nursing facilities; intermediate care facilities; assisted living communities; personal care homes; ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facilities; health maintenance organizations; home health agencies; and diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitation centers.

“Hospice” means a public agency or private organization or unit of either providing to persons terminally ill and to their families, regardless of ability to pay, a centrally administered and autonomous continuum of palliative and supportive care, directed and coordinated by the hospice care team primarily in the patient’s home but also on an outpatient and short-term inpatient basis and which is classified as hospice by the department. In addition, such public agency or private organization or unit of either may also provide palliative care to persons with advanced and progressive diseases and to their families, directed and coordinated by the hospice care team.

“Hospice care” means both regularly scheduled care and care available on a 24 hour on-call basis, consisting of medical, nursing, social, spiritual, volunteer, and bereavement services substantially all of which are provided to the patient and to the patient’s family regardless of ability to pay under a written care plan established and periodically reviewed by the patient’s attending physician, by the medical director of the hospice program, and by the hospice care team.

“Hospice care team” means an interdisciplinary working unit composed of members of the various helping professions (who may donate their professional services), including but not limited to: a physician licensed or authorized to practice in this state, a registered professional nurse, a social worker, a member of the clergy or other counselor, and volunteers who provide hospice care.

“Hospice patient family unit” means the terminally ill person or person with an advanced and progressive disease and his or her family, which may include spouse, children, siblings, parents, and other relatives with significant personal ties to the patient.

“License” means a license issued by the department.

“Palliative care” means those interventions by the hospice care team which are intended to alleviate suffering and to achieve relief from, reduction of, or elimination of pain and of other physical, emotional, social, or spiritual symptoms of distress to achieve the best quality of life for the patients and their families.

“Patient” means a terminally ill individual receiving the hospice continuum of services, regardless of ability to pay, and also means an individual with an advanced and progressive disease.

“Terminally ill” means that the individual is experiencing an illness for which therapeutic intervention directed toward cure of the disease is no longer appropriate, and the patient’s medical prognosis is one in which there is a life expectancy of six months or less.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1055, § 1/HB 1008; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 16/SB 178.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 1055, § 2A/HB 1008, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making specific reference to this Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure.” Funds were appropriated in the 2006 session of the General Assembly and became available for expenditure on July 1, 2006.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.08.20.03, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-7-173.
License required.

No person, private or public organization, political subdivision, or other governmental agency may operate a hospice as defined in Code Section 31-7-172 without first obtaining license from the department. A license issued under this article is not assignable or transferable and must be separate from any existing license and is subject to suspension or revocation at any time for failure to comply with the provisions of this article or with the appropriate regulations promulgated by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-173

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.08.20.03, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-7-174.
Application for license.

Any person, organization, or agency desiring to operate a hospice shall file with the department an application on a form prescribed and furnished by the department. The application shall contain such reasonable information as the department may require related to the department’s licensure purpose and function.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-174

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.

31-7-175.
Administration of article.

The administration of this article is vested in the Department of Community Health which shall:

Prepare and furnish all forms necessary under the provisions of this article in relation to the application for licensure or renewals thereof;

After consultation with appropriate public interest groups, adopt rules within the standards of this article necessary to effect the purposes of this article; and

Establish comprehensive rules and regulations for the licensure of hospices.

Rules promulgated by the department shall include but not be limited to the following:

The qualifications of professional and ancillary personnel in order to furnish adequate hospice care;

Comprehensive standards for the organization and quality of patient care;

Procedures for maintaining records;

Comprehensive standards for inpatient facilities, to include specifications that the hospice retain primary responsibility for the coordination of inpatient hospice care;

Provision for contractual arrangements for professional and ancillary hospice services; and

Provisions for the imposition of administrative fines for any violations of any provisions of this article or of department rules or regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-175

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-18/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-7-176.
Responsibilities of provider of hospice care.

The hospice care program shall coordinate its services with those of the patient’s primary or attending physicians, and may contract out for elements of services rendered to the patient and family unit, but not for the basic hospice care services, provided by physicians, attending nurses, and counselors. The hospice care team shall be responsible for coordination of inpatient, outpatient, and home care aspects of care.

Hospice services must meet all applicable definitions provided for in Code Section 31-7-172.

A hospice program of care shall not impose the dictates of any value or belief system on its patients and their family units.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article to the contrary, a hospice may, in addition to providing care to terminally ill individuals, also provide palliative care for patients with advanced and progressive diseases and for their families. Such care may be provided by a hospice acting alone or under contract with a health care facility.

Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the provision of palliative care for patients with advanced and progressive diseases and for their families by any other health care provider otherwise authorized to provide such care.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-176

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1055, § 2/HB 1008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 1055, § 2A/HB 1008, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making specific reference to this Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure.” Funds were appropriated in the 2006 session of the General Assembly and became available for expenditure on July 1, 2006.

31-7-176.1.
Determination or pronouncement of death.

When a patient who is terminally ill or whose death is anticipated and who is receiving hospice care from a licensed hospice dies, a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a registered professional nurse licensed in this state and employed by such hospice at the time of apparent death of such person, in the absence of an attending physician, may make the determination and pronouncement of the death of said patient. Such determination or pronouncement shall be made in writing on a form approved by the commissioner of community health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-176.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1392, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2017, p. 625, § 2/SB 96.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the first sentence, inserted “a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or” near the beginning and deleted “; provided, however, that, when a hospice patient is a registered organ donor, only a physician may make the determination or pronouncement of death” following “said patient” at the end.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1992 enactment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 265 (1992).

31-7-177.
Inpatient beds.

Since hospice care is primarily provided at home, licensure shall not be determined solely on the number of inpatient beds needed for service. Inpatient beds under contract to a hospice program may be used by the hospice when needed but may remain otherwise available to the inpatient unit at other times without a change in licensing.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-177

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.

31-7-178.
Inspection.

The department shall periodically inspect each hospice for which a license has been issued to ensure that the licensee is providing quality care to its patients; provided, however, that a hospice shall be exempt from additional on-site licensure inspection if certified in accordance with federal regulations governing hospices.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-178

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-7-179.
Certificate of need not required.

Where a hospice has obtained a license from the department, there shall be no requirement that the hospice obtain a certificate of need in order to provide any hospice care.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-179

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 2.